Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.010

Accounting—Funds—Indebtedness—Bonds.

Municipal accounts and funds, the contracting of indebtedness for municipal purposes and the issuance and payment of bonds therefor, the validation of preexisting obligations by the voters of a consolidated city, debt limitations, elections for authorization of the incurring of indebtedness, and provisions pertaining to the issuance, sale, funding and redemption of general obligation bonds and remedies for nonpayment thereof are governed and controlled by the general law as contained in, but not limited to chapters 35.37, 39.40, 39.46, 39.52, 39.56, and 43.80 RCW, and are hereby recognized as applicable to code cities.

[ 1984 c 186 s 24; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.010.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.